Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.130

Enforcement of collective bargaining agreements—Arbitrators—Subpoenas—Superior court.

(1) For the purposes of implementing final and binding arbitration under grievance procedures required by RCW 41.80.030, the parties to a collective bargaining agreement may agree on one or more permanent umpires to serve as arbitrator, or may agree on any impartial person to serve as arbitrator, or may agree to select arbitrators from any source available to them, including federal and private agencies, in addition to the staff and list of arbitrators maintained by the commission. If the parties cannot agree to the selection of an arbitrator, the commission shall supply a list of names in accordance with the procedures established by the commission.

(2) An arbitrator may require any person to attend as a witness and to bring with him or her any book, record, document, or other evidence. The fees for such attendance shall be paid by the party requesting issuance of the subpoena and shall be the same as the fees of witnesses in the superior court. Arbitrators may administer oaths. Subpoenas shall issue and be signed by the arbitrator and shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas to testify before a court of record in this state. If any person so summoned to testify refuses or neglects to obey such subpoena, upon petition authorized by the arbitrator, the superior court may compel the attendance of the person before the arbitrator or punish the person for contempt in the same manner provided for the attendance of witnesses or the punishment of them in the courts of this state.

(3) The arbitrator shall appoint a time and place for the hearing and notify the parties thereof, and may adjourn the hearing from time to time as may be necessary, and, on application of either party and for good cause, may postpone the hearing to a time not extending beyond the date fixed by the collective bargaining agreement for making the award. The arbitration award shall be in writing and signed by the arbitrator. The arbitrator shall, promptly upon its rendition, serve a true copy of the award on each of the parties or their attorneys of record.

(4) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter refuses to submit a grievance for arbitration, the other party to the collective bargaining agreement may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court of Thurston county or of any county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have jurisdiction to issue an order compelling arbitration. Disputes concerning compliance with grievance procedures shall be reserved for determination by the arbitrator. Arbitration shall be ordered if the grievance states a claim that on its face is covered by the collective bargaining agreement. Doubts as to the coverage of the arbitration clause shall be resolved in favor of arbitration.

(5) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter refuses to comply with the award of an arbitrator determining a grievance arising under the collective bargaining agreement, the other party to the collective bargaining agreement may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court of Thurston county or of any county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have jurisdiction to issue an order enforcing the arbitration award.

[ 2002 c 354 s 314.]